Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1001
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 46-1001 to 46-1020, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) District means a rural water district organized pursuant to sections 46-1001 to 46-1020;

(2) Board means the governing body of a district;

(3) The terms county board and county clerk mean, respectively, the county board and county clerk of the county in which the greatest portion of the territory of any existing or proposed rural water district is located;

(4) Participating member means an individual, firm, partnership, limited liability company, association, or corporation which owns land located within a district and which has subscribed to one or more benefit units of such district; and

(5) Chief Water Officer means the Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 1967, c. 279, § 1, p. 747;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 280;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 229;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 252.